Louisiana, session 2026, HB141.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Code of Civil Procedure Article 253(B)(2) is hereby amended and
reenacted to read as follows:
Art. 253. Pleadings, documents, and exhibits to be filed with clerk
* * *
B.
* * *
(2) On and after January 1, 2026, all filings as provided in Paragraph A of
this Article and all other provisions of this Chapter filed by an attorney shall only be
filed in person in paper form or transmitted electronically in accordance with a
system established by a clerk of court or by Louisiana Clerks' Remote Access
Authority. The filer shall be responsible for ensuring that private information is not
included in filings. No filing shall include the first five digits of any social security
number, tax identification numbers, state identification numbers, driver's license
numbers, financial account numbers, full dates of birth, or any information protected
from disclosure by state or federal law. The clerk of court shall adopt a system for
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 141 ENROLLED
the electronic filing and storage of any pleading, document, or exhibit filed with a
pleading. A pleading or document filed electronically is deemed filed on the date
and time stated on the confirmation of electronic filing sent from the system, if the
clerk of court accepts the electronic filing. Public access to electronically filed
pleadings and documents shall be in accordance with the rules governing access to
paper filings.
* * *
Section 2. Code of Criminal Procedure Article 14.1(B) is hereby amended and
reenacted to read as follows:
Art. 14.1. Electronic filings
* * *
B.(1) Beginning January 1, 2026, all filings as provided in this Article and
all other provisions of this Code, except for expungement proceedings, filed by an
attorney shall only be filed in person in paper form or transmitted electronically in
accordance with a system established by a clerk of court or by the Louisiana Clerks'
Remote Access Authority. The Except as provided in Subparagraph (2) of this
Paragraph, the filer shall be responsible for ensuring that private information is not
included in filings. No filing shall include the first five digits of any social security
number, tax identification numbers, state identification numbers, driver's license
numbers, financial account numbers, full dates of birth, or any information protected
from disclosure by state or federal law. The clerk of court shall adopt a system for
the electronic filing and storage of any pleading, document, or exhibit other than
those documents or exhibits introduced and filed at a hearing or trial. Furthermore,
in a court that accepts electronic filings in accordance with this Paragraph, the
official record shall be the electronic record. A pleading or document filed
electronically is deemed filed on the date and time stated on the confirmation of
electronic filing sent from the system, if the clerk of court accepts the electronic
filing. Public access to electronically filed pleadings and documents shall be in
accordance with the rules governing access to written filings.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 141 ENROLLED
(2) Nothing in this Article shall limit the information required to be provided
by a prosecuting agency pursuant to Article 388.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.